District of Columbia statutes.
7-2509.06

Carrying a pistol while impaired.

(a)

A licensee shall not carry a pistol while he or she is consuming alcohol.

(b)

A licensee shall not carry a pistol while impaired.

(c)

Upon establishing reasonable suspicion that a licensee has been consuming drugs or alcohol, a licensee’s failure to submit to one or more field sobriety, breathalyzer, or urine tests, administered to determine whether the licensee is impaired while carrying a pistol, shall be grounds for summary suspension of the license pursuant to §  7-2509.05(b).

(d)

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who violates this section shall be subject to revocation of his or her license.

(e)

For the purposes of this section, the term “impaired” means a licensee has consumed alcohol or other drug or drugs and that it has affected the licensee’s behavior in a way that can be perceived or noticed.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, § 906
as added June 16, 2015, D.C. Law 20-279, § 2(f), 62 DCR 1944